California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(B) For purposes of this paragraph, in order to prove that a person knowingly rented, leased, or made available the commercial property for unlawful commercial cannabis activity, it shall be demonstrated that the person had actual knowledge that the cannabis-related activity was for commercial purposes, required a license, and was unlicensed. The presence of a lawful amount of cannabis, cannabis products, or cannabis plants, subject to Sections 11362.1 and 11362.45 of the Health and Safety Code, shall not be evidence of actual knowledge.

(4) In assessing a penalty, a court shall give due consideration to the appropriateness of the amount of the civil penalty with respect to factors the court determines to be relevant, including the
 following:

(A) The gravity of the violation by the licensee or person.

(B) The good faith of the licensee or person.

(C) The licensee’s or person’s history of previous violations.

(D) Whether, and to what extent, the licensee or person profited from the unlicensed cannabis activity.

(5) Cannabis or cannabis products associated with a violation described in this subdivision may be destroyed in accordance with Section 11479 of the Health and Safety Code. The person in violation shall be responsible for the cost of the destruction of cannabis or cannabis products associated with their violation.

(b) An action for civil penalties brought against a person pursuant to this division shall not be commenced unless the action is filed within three years from the date of the violation.

(c) (1) Actions for civil penalties pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) may be brought by the Attorney General on behalf of the people, on behalf of the department, or on behalf of the participating agency, or by a city or county counsel or city prosecutor.

(2) Actions for civil penalties pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) shall be brought exclusively by the Attorney General on behalf of the people, on behalf of the department, or on behalf of the participating agency, or by a city or county counsel or
 city prosecutor in a city or county having a population in excess of 750,000.

(3) Actions for civil penalties pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) shall be brought exclusively by the Attorney General on behalf of the people, on behalf of the department, or on behalf of the participating agency, or by a city or county counsel, or city prosecutor.

(d) (1) All civil penalties imposed and collected pursuant to this section by a court shall be deposited into the General Fund except as provided in this subdivision.

(2) If an action for civil penalties is brought against a person pursuant to this division by the Attorney General on behalf of the people or on behalf of the department or a participating
 agency, the penalty shall first be used to reimburse the Attorney General and the department or the participating agency for the costs of investigating and prosecuting the action, including expert fees and reasonable attorney’s fees, with the remainder, if any, to be deposited into the General Fund.

(3) If the action is brought by a county counsel, the penalty shall first be used to reimburse the county counsel for the costs of bringing the action for civil penalties, with one-half of the remainder, if any, to be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered and one-half deposited into the General Fund.

(4) If the action is brought by a city attorney or city prosecutor, the penalty collected shall first be used to reimburse the city attorney or
 city prosecutor for the costs of bringing the action for civil penalties, with one-half of the remainder, if any, to be paid to the treasurer of the city in which the complaining attorney has jurisdiction and one-half deposited into the General Fund.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), criminal penalties shall continue to apply to an unlicensed person engaging in commercial cannabis activity in violation of this division.

(f) (1) This section does not limit, preempt, or otherwise affect any other state or local law, rule, regulation, or ordinance applicable to the conduct described in subdivision (a), or otherwise relating to commercial cannabis activities.

(2) This section is meant to further the intent of
 the Control, Regulate and Tax Adult Use of Marijuana Act of 2016 (AUMA), which allows local governments to reasonably regulate the cultivation of nonmedical cannabis for personal use by adults 21 years of age and older through zoning and other local laws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 248, Sec. 8.   (AB 8)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

26038.1.

(a) In addition to other remedies permitted by law, a licensee under this division may bring an action in superior court against a person engaging in commercial cannabis activity without a license as required by this division.

(b) In order to prevail in an action brought pursuant to subdivision (a), a licensee shall demonstrate actual harm resulting from the unlicensed commercial cannabis activity.

(c) In an action pursuant to subdivision (a), the court may enter an order enjoining the defendant from engaging in commercial cannabis activity without a license as required by this division.

(d) A licensee that prevails in an action brought pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be entitled to both of the following:

(1) Either of the following damages, at the election of the prevailing licensee:

(A) Actual damages caused by the unlicensed commercial cannabis activity.

(B) Statutory damages not to exceed seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000).

(2) Reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.

(e) This section does not apply to any violation of the Labor Code committed by a person engaging in unlicensed cannabis activity and shall not form the basis for a cause of action under the Labor Code Private Attorneys General Act of 2004 (Part 13 (commencing with Section 2698) of Division 2 of the Labor Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 467, Sec. 1.   (AB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

26039.1.

(a) When the department has evidence that cannabis or a cannabis product is adulterated or misbranded, the department shall notify the licensee. The licensee may conduct a voluntary recall of the affected cannabis or cannabis product and may remediate the cannabis or cannabis product, if approved by the department, or shall destroy the affected cannabis or cannabis product under the supervision of the department.

(b) The department may issue a mandatory recall order and require the licensee to immediately cease distribution of cannabis or a cannabis product and recall the cannabis or cannabis product if the department determines both of the following:

(1) The cultivation, manufacture, distribution, or sale of the cannabis or cannabis product creates or poses an immediate and serious threat to human life or
 health.

(2) Other procedures available to the department to remedy or prevent the occurrence of the situation would result in an unreasonable delay.

(c) The department shall provide the licensee an opportunity for an informal proceeding on the matter, as determined by the department, within five days, on the actions required by the order and on why the cannabis or cannabis product should not be recalled. Following the proceeding, the order shall be affirmed, modified, or set aside as determined appropriate by the department.

(d) The department’s powers set forth in this section expressly include the power to order movement, segregation, isolation, or destruction of cannabis or cannabis products, as well as the power to hold cannabis or cannabis products in place.

(e) If the department determines it is necessary, it may issue the mandatory recall order, may conduct the recall, and may use all appropriate measures to obtain reimbursement from the licensee for any and all costs associated with these orders. All funds obtained by the department from these efforts shall be deposited in the Cannabis Control Fund, and shall be available for use by the department upon appropriation by the Legislature.

(f) It is unlawful to move or allow to be moved cannabis or a cannabis product subject to an order issued pursuant to this section unless that person has first obtained written authorization from the department.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 26132 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 70.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

26039.3.

(a) If the department finds or has probable cause to believe that cannabis or a cannabis product is adulterated or misbranded within the meaning of this division, or the sale of the cannabis or cannabis product would be in violation of this division, the department shall affix to the cannabis or cannabis product, or component thereof, a tag or other appropriate marking. The department shall give notice that the cannabis or cannabis product is, or is suspected of being, adulterated or misbranded, or the sale of the cannabis or cannabis product would be in violation of this division and has been embargoed and that the cannabis or cannabis product shall not be removed or disposed of by sale or otherwise until permission for removal or disposal is given by the department or a court.

(b) (1) It is unlawful to remove, sell, or dispose of embargoed cannabis or an embargoed cannabis product without written permission of the department or a court. The removal, sale, or disposal of each item of embargoed cannabis or cannabis product without written permission of the department constitutes a violation of this subdivision. A violation of this subdivision is subject to a citation and fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a licensed cultivator may request permission for the continued cultivation or harvesting of the cannabis subject to embargo. The department may authorize, and may impose conditions on, the continued cultivation or harvesting of the cannabis subject to embargo.

(c) If the adulteration or misbranding can be corrected by proper labeling or additional processing of the cannabis
 or cannabis product and all of the provisions of this division can be complied with, the licensee may request that the department remove the tag or other marking to permit correction. If, under the supervision of the department, the adulteration or misbranding has been corrected, the department may remove the tag or other marking. Cannabis and cannabis products found at an unlicensed location, or cultivated, processed, produced, or manufactured at an unlicensed location, or derived from an unlicensed source, cannot be corrected and shall be destroyed.

(d) If the department finds that cannabis or a cannabis product that is embargoed is not adulterated or misbranded, or that its sale is not otherwise in violation of this division, the department may remove the tag or other marking.

(e) The cannabis or cannabis product may be destroyed by the licensee or product owner pursuant to a corrective action plan approved by the department and under the supervision of the department. The cannabis or cannabis product shall be destroyed at the expense of the licensee or product owner.

(f) The department may condemn cannabis or a cannabis product under the
 provisions of this section. A proceeding for condemnation shall be subject to appropriate notice to, and the opportunity for a hearing with regard to, the person or licensee affected in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(1) Upon a finding by the administrative law judge that the cannabis or cannabis product is adulterated or misbranded, or that its sale is otherwise in violation of this division, the administrative law judge may direct the cannabis or cannabis product to be destroyed at the expense of the licensee or product owner and under the supervision of the department. The licensee or owner of the affected cannabis or cannabis product shall pay fees and reasonable costs, including the costs of storage, testing, and supervision, incurred by the department in investigating and prosecuting the action taken pursuant to this section.

(2) Upon a finding by the administrative law judge that the adulteration or misbranding can be corrected by proper labeling or additional processing of the cannabis or cannabis product and that all provisions of this division can be complied with, the administrative law judge may direct the cannabis or cannabis products to be brought into compliance under the department’s supervision. The licensee shall pay fees and reasonable costs, including the costs of storage, testing, and supervision, incurred by the department in investigating and prosecuting the action. After the costs, fees, and expenses have been paid, the department may release the embargo and remove the tag or other marking and supervise the corrective action.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 26133 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 71.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

26039.4.

A peace officer, including a peace officer with the department, may seize cannabis, industrial hemp, and cannabis products in any of the following circumstances:

(a) The cannabis or cannabis product is subject to recall or embargo by the department.

(b) The cannabis or cannabis product is subject to seizure or destruction pursuant to this division.

(c) The cannabis or cannabis product is seized related to an investigation or disciplinary action for violation of this division.

(d) The industrial hemp or cannabis product is subject
 to seizure under the Sherman Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Law (Part 5 (commencing with Section 109875) of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code).

(e) The industrial hemp is in violation of United States Domestic Industrial Hemp Program (7 U.S.C. § 990 et seq.), and, if applicable, the California State Regulatory Plan for Hemp Production (Chapter 8 of Division 4 of Title 3 of the California Code of Regulations), or an applicable tribal plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 248, Sec. 9.   (AB 8)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

26039.5.

(a) Cannabis or a cannabis product is misbranded if it is any of the following:

(1) Cultivated, processed, manufactured, packed, or held in a location not duly licensed as provided in this division.

(2) Consists of cannabis or cannabis product that was cultivated, processed, manufactured, packed, or held in a location not duly licensed as provided in this division. 

(3) Its labeling is false or misleading in any particular.

(4) Its labeling or packaging does not conform to the requirements of Section 26120 or any other labeling or packaging requirement established pursuant to this division.

(b) It is unlawful to cultivate, process, manufacture, sell, deliver, hold, or offer for sale cannabis or a cannabis product that is misbranded.

(c) It is unlawful to misbrand cannabis or a cannabis product.

(d) It is unlawful to receive in commerce cannabis or a cannabis product that is misbranded or to distribute, deliver, or offer for delivery any such cannabis or cannabis product.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 26121 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 67.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

26039.6.

(a) Cannabis or a cannabis product is adulterated if it is any of the following:

(1) It has been produced, prepared, packed, or held under unsanitary conditions in which it may have become contaminated with filth or in which it may have been rendered injurious.

(2) It consists, in whole or in part, of any filthy, putrid, or decomposed substance.

(3) It bears or contains any poisonous or deleterious substance that may render it injurious to users under the conditions of use suggested in the labeling or under conditions that are customary or usual.

(4) It bears or contains a substance that is restricted or limited under this division or regulations promulgated pursuant to this division and the level of substance in the product exceeds the limits specified pursuant to this division or in regulation.

(5) Its concentrations differ from, or its purity or quality is below, that which it is represented to possess.

(6) The methods, facilities, or controls used for its cultivation, manufacture, packing, or holding do not conform to, or are not operated or administered in conformity with, practices established by regulations adopted under this division to ensure that the cannabis or cannabis product meets the requirements of this division as to safety and has the concentrations
 it purports to have and meets the quality and purity characteristics that it purports or is represented to possess.

(7) Its container is composed, in whole or in part, of any poisonous or deleterious substance that may render the contents injurious to health.

(8) It is a cannabis product and a substance has been mixed or packed with it after testing by a testing laboratory so as to reduce its quality or concentration or if a substance has been substituted, wholly or in part, for the cannabis product.

(b) It is unlawful to cultivate, manufacture, distribute, sell, deliver, hold, or offer for sale cannabis or a cannabis product that is adulterated.

(c) It is unlawful to adulterate cannabis or a cannabis product.

(d) It is unlawful to receive in commerce cannabis or a cannabis product that is adulterated or to distribute, deliver, or proffer for delivery any such cannabis or cannabis product.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 248, Sec. 10.   (AB 8)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Appeals [26040. - 26047.]

26040.

(a) (1) There is established in state government, in the Business and Consumer Services Agency, a Cannabis Control Appeals Panel which shall consist of the following members:

(A) One member appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules.

(B) One member appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.

(C) Three members appointed by the Governor and subject to confirmation by a majority vote of all of the members elected to the Senate.

(2) Each member appointed by the Governor, at the time of their initial appointment, shall be a resident of a different county from the one in which either of the other members appointed by the Governor resides. Members of the
 panel shall receive an annual salary as provided for by Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 11550) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) The members of the panel may be removed from office by their appointing authority.

(c) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall become operative on July 1, 2026.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 28, Sec. 10.   (SB 170)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Operative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

26041.

All personnel of the panel shall be appointed, employed, directed, and controlled by the panel consistent with state civil service requirements. The Executive Director of the panel shall furnish the equipment, supplies, and housing necessary for the authorized activities of the panel and shall perform such other mechanics of administration as determined by the panel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 30.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

26042.

The panel shall adopt procedures for appeals similar to the procedures used in Article 3 (commencing with Section 23075) and Article 4 (commencing with Section 23080) of Chapter 1.5 of Division 9 of the Business and Professions Code. Such procedures shall be adopted in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 64, Sec. 6.1.)
-------------------------------------------

26043.

(a) After proceedings pursuant to Section 26031, 26031.5, or 26058 or Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 480) or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 490) of Division 1.5, any person aggrieved by the decision of the department denying the person’s application for any license, denying the person’s renewal of any license, placing any license on probation, imposing any condition on any license, imposing any fine on any license or licensee, assessing any penalty on any license, or canceling, suspending, revoking, or otherwise disciplining any license as provided for under this division, may appeal the department’s written decision to the panel.

(b) The panel shall review the decision subject to such limitations as may be imposed by the Legislature. In such cases, the panel shall not receive evidence in addition to that considered by the department.

(c) Review by the panel of a decision of the department shall be limited to the following questions:

(1) Whether the department has proceeded without or in excess of its jurisdiction.

(2) Whether the department has proceeded in the manner required by law.

(3) Whether the decision is supported by the findings.

(4) Whether the findings are supported by substantial evidence in the light of the whole record.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 31.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

26044.

(a) In appeals where the panel finds that there is relevant evidence which, in the exercise of reasonable diligence, could not have been produced or which was improperly excluded at the hearing before the department, it may enter an order remanding the matter to the department for reconsideration in the light of that evidence.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (a), in all appeals, the panel shall enter an order either affirming or reversing the decision of the department. When the order reverses the decision of the department, the panel may direct the reconsideration of the matter in the light of its order and may direct the department to take such further action as is specially enjoined upon it by law, but the order shall not limit or control in any way the discretion vested by law in the department

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 32.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

26045.

(a) No court of this state, except the Supreme Court and the courts of appeal to the extent specified in this chapter, shall have jurisdiction to review, affirm, reverse, correct, or annul any order, rule, or decision of the department or to suspend, stay, or delay the operation or execution thereof, or to restrain, enjoin, or interfere with the department in the performance of its duties, but a writ of mandate shall lie from the Supreme Court or the courts of appeal in any proper case.

(b) Any person affected by a final order of the panel, including the department, may apply to the Supreme Court or to the court of appeal for the appellate district in which the proceeding arose, for a writ of review of that final order.

(c) The application for writ of review shall be made within 30 days after filing of the final order.

(d) The provisions of the Code of Civil Procedure relating to writs of review shall, insofar as applicable, apply to proceedings in the courts as provided by this chapter. A copy of every pleading filed pursuant to this chapter shall be served on the panel, the department, and on each party who entered an appearance before the panel.

(e) No decision of the department that has been appealed to the panel and no final order of the panel shall become effective during the period in which application may be made for a writ of review, as provided by subdivision (c).

(f) The filing of a petition for, or the pendency of, a writ of review shall not of itself stay or suspend the operation of any order, rule, or decision of the department, but the court before which the petition is filed may stay or suspend, in whole or in part, the operation of the order, rule, or decision of the department subject to review, upon the terms and conditions which it by order directs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 33.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

26046.

(a) The review by the court shall not extend further than to determine, based on the whole record of the department as certified by the panel, whether:

(1) The department has proceeded without or in excess of its jurisdiction.

(2) The department has proceeded in the manner required by law.

(3) The decision of the department is supported by the findings.

(4) The findings in the department’s decision are supported by substantial evidence in the light of the whole record.

(5) There is relevant evidence which, in the exercise of reasonable diligence, could not have been produced or which was improperly excluded at the hearing before the department.

(b) Nothing in this chapter shall permit the court to hold a trial de novo, to take evidence, or to exercise its independent judgment on the evidence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 34.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

26047.

The findings and conclusions of the department on questions of fact are conclusive and final and are not subject to review. Those questions of fact shall include ultimate facts and the findings and conclusions of the department. The panel, the department, and each party to the action or proceeding before the panel shall have the right to appear in the review proceeding. Following the hearing, the court shall enter judgment either affirming or reversing the decision of the department, or the court may remand the case for further proceedings before or reconsideration by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 35.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Licensing [26050. - 26059.]

26050.

(a) The license classification pursuant to this division shall, at a minimum, be as follows:

(1) Type 1—Cultivation; Specialty outdoor; Small.

(2) Type 1A—Cultivation; Specialty indoor; Small.

(3) Type 1B—Cultivation; Specialty mixed-light; Small.

(4) Type 1C—Cultivation; Specialty cottage; Small.

(5) Type 2—Cultivation; Outdoor; Small.

(6) Type 2A—Cultivation; Indoor; Small.

(7) Type 2B—Cultivation; Mixed-light; Small.

(8) Type 3—Cultivation; Outdoor; Medium.

(9) Type 3A—Cultivation; Indoor; Medium.

(10) Type 3B—Cultivation; Mixed-light; Medium.

(11) Type 4—Cultivation; Nursery.

(12) Type 5—Cultivation; Outdoor; Large.

(13) Type 5A—Cultivation; Indoor; Large.

(14) Type 5B—Cultivation; Mixed-light; Large.

(15) Type 6—Manufacturer 1.

(16) Type 7—Manufacturer 2.

(17) Type 8—Testing laboratory.

(18) Type 10—Retailer.

(19) Type 11—Distributor.

(20) Type 12—Microbusiness.

(21) Type 13—Cannabis event organizer.

(22) Type 14—Processor.

(23) Type 15—Combined activities.

(b) With the exception of testing laboratory licenses, which may be used to test cannabis and cannabis products regardless of whether
 they are intended for use by individuals who possess a physician’s recommendation, all licenses issued under this division shall bear a clear designation indicating whether the license is for commercial adult-use cannabis activity as distinct from commercial medicinal cannabis activity by prominently affixing an “A” or “M,” respectively. Examples of such a designation include, but are not limited to, “A-Type 1” or “M-Type 1.” Except as specifically specified in this division, the requirements for A-licenses and M-licenses shall be the same. For testing laboratories, the department shall create a license that indicates a testing laboratory may test both adult-use and medicinal cannabis.

(c) A license issued pursuant to this division shall be valid for 12 months from the date of issuance. The license may be renewed annually.

(d) The department shall establish procedures for the issuance and renewal of licenses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 875, Sec. 3.   (SB 1064)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

26050.5.

(a) Until January 1, 2031, the department may, in its sole discretion, issue a provisional license for a local equity applicant, as defined in Chapter 23 (commencing with Section 26240), for retailer activities, if the applicant has submitted a completed license application to the department, provided that the applicant meets the following requirements:

(1) If compliance with the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code) is not complete, evidence that compliance is underway.

(2) If compliance with local ordinances enacted pursuant
 to Section 26200 is not complete, evidence that compliance is underway.

(3) Compliance with paragraphs (5) and (11) of subdivision (a) of Section 26051.5.

(b) A provisional license issued pursuant to this section shall be valid for no more than 12 months from the date it was issued or renewed. If the department issues or renews a provisional license, it shall include the outstanding items needed to qualify for an annual license specific to the licensee.

(c) The department may, in its sole discretion, renew a provisional license for a local equity applicant for retailer activities issued pursuant to this section or Section 26050.2 until it issues or denies the provisional licensee’s annual license, subject to the requirements
 of this section, or until five years from the date the provisional license was originally issued pursuant to this section or Section 26050.2, whichever is earlier.

(d) If compliance with the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code) is not yet complete, the department shall not renew a provisional license pursuant to this section unless the department has determined that one of the following requirements has been met:

(1) The lead agency is in the process of preparing a site-specific initial study, addendum, or checklist pursuant to Section 15063, 15164, 15168, or 15183 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations to demonstrate whether it is consistent with a previously circulated and adopted negative
 declaration, mitigated negative declaration, or environmental impact report.

(2) If a local jurisdiction is the lead agency, the lead agency has made substantial progress during the previous 12-month licensure term toward completing project-specific environmental review by drafting, preparing, or circulating for public review an environmental document pursuant to the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code).

(3) If the department is the lead agency, information requested by the department of the provisional licensee demonstrates the furtherance of environmental review.

(4) Information submitted to the department by the provisional licensee
 applicant demonstrates evidence of substantial progress toward compliance with the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code) during the previous 12-month licensure term.

(e) The department, in its sole discretion, may allow a provisional licensee to move locations after the date provisional licenses can no longer be issued provided that the new location is approved in compliance with the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code), and Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1600) of Division 2 of the Fish and Game Code. If all other renewal requirements are satisfied, the department may also renew the license at the new location.

(f) The
 department may, in its sole discretion, revoke or suspend a provisional license if it determines the licensee failed to actively and diligently pursue requirements for the annual license. The department shall adopt regulations clarifying what constitutes actively and diligently pursuing requirements for the annual license.

(g) The department shall cancel a provisional license upon issuance of an annual license, denial of an annual license, abandonment of an application for licensure, or withdrawal of an application for licensure.

(h) Except as specified in this section, the provisions of this division shall apply to a provisional license in the same manner as to an annual license.

(i) Without limiting any other statutory
 exemption or categorical exemption, Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code does not apply to the issuance of a license pursuant to this section by the department, except as otherwise provided in this section.

(j) Refusal by the department to issue a license pursuant to this section or revocation or suspension by the department of a license issued pursuant to this section shall not entitle the applicant or licensee to a hearing or an appeal of the decision. Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 480) of Division 1.5 and Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 26040) of this division and Sections 26031 and 26058 do not apply to licenses issued pursuant to this section.

(k) (1) On or before January 1, 2030, the department shall report
 to the appropriate committees of the Legislature on the number of provisional licenses that have been granted under this section, the number of provisional licenses that have been canceled for each of the circumstances provided in subdivision (g), and the number of provisional licenses granted under this section that remain active at the time of the report.

(2) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under this subdivision is inoperative on January 1, 2034, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(3) A report to be submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 593, Sec. 2.   (SB 51)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

26051.

(a) The Cartwright Act, the Unfair Practices Act, the Unfair Competition Law, and the other provisions of Part 2 (commencing with Section 16600) of Division 7 apply to all licensees regulated under this division.

(b) It shall be unlawful for any person to monopolize, attempt to monopolize, or combine or conspire with any person or persons to monopolize, any part of the trade or commerce related to cannabis. The Attorney General shall have the sole authority to enforce the provisions of this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 875, Sec. 4.   (SB 1064)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

26051.5.

(a) An applicant for a state license issued pursuant to this division to conduct commercial cannabis activity, as defined in Section 26001, shall do all of the following:

(1) Except as provided in subparagraph (G), require that each owner, as defined in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (aq) of Section 26001, electronically submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information required by the Department of Justice for the purpose of obtaining information as to the existence and content of a record of state or federal
 convictions and state and federal arrests, and also information as to the existence and content of a record of state or federal convictions and arrests for which the Department of Justice establishes that the person is free on bail or on their own recognizance pending trial or appeal.

(A) Notwithstanding any other law, the department may obtain criminal history information from the Department of Justice and the Federal Bureau of Investigation for an applicant or its owners, as defined in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (aq) of Section 26001, for any state license, as described in Section 26050, under this division pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(B) When received, the Department of Justice shall transmit fingerprint
 images and related information received pursuant to this section to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for the purpose of obtaining a federal criminal history records check. The Department of Justice shall review the information returned from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and compile and disseminate a response to the licensing authority.

(C) The Department of Justice shall provide a response to the licensing authority pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(D) The department shall request from the Department of Justice subsequent notification service, as provided pursuant to Section 11105.2 of the Penal Code, for applicants.

(E) The Department of Justice shall charge the
 applicant a fee sufficient to cover the reasonable cost of processing the requests described in this paragraph.

(F) Notwithstanding any other law, a licensing authority may request and receive from a local or state agency certified records of all arrests and convictions, certified records regarding probation, and any and all other related documentation needed to complete an applicant or licensee investigation. A local or state agency may provide those records to a licensing authority upon request.

(G) If an owner has previously submitted fingerprint images and related information required by the Department of Justice pursuant to this paragraph in connection with a valid state license issued by a licensing authority, all of the following apply:

(i) The owner shall not be required to submit additional fingerprint images and related information pursuant to this paragraph in connection with a subsequent application for a state license.

(ii) The department shall not consider the owner’s criminal history information obtained from the fingerprint images and related information that were previously submitted pursuant to this paragraph when considering whether to issue a subsequent state license.

(iii) An owner shall not be required to resubmit owner-related information previously provided to the department.

(2) Provide evidence of the legal right to occupy and use the proposed location and provide a statement from the landowner of real property
 or that landowner’s agent where the commercial cannabis activity will occur, as proof to demonstrate the landowner has acknowledged and consented to permit commercial cannabis activities to be conducted on the property by the tenant applicant.

(3) Provide evidence that the proposed location is in compliance with subdivision (b) of Section 26054.

(4) Provide a statement, signed by the applicant under penalty of perjury, that the information provided is complete, true, and accurate.

(5) (A) (i) For an applicant with 20 or more employees, or an applicant with 10 or more employees that submits an application on or after July 1, 2024, provide a notarized statement that the applicant will
 enter into, or demonstrate that it has already entered into, and will abide by the terms of a labor peace agreement. On and after July 1, 2024, the department shall not renew a license for a licensee with 10 or more employees unless the licensee provides a statement that the licensee has already entered into and will abide by the terms of a labor peace agreement.
